test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_E.EHL_STEM_3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - xál k̲áat'e.ehl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_E.EHL_STEM_3

     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'e.eelaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INDIRECT+PAST: xál k̲áat'e.eelaan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: xál k̲áat'e.eelaas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'e.eelaa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'e.eel'ahlanggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+CERTAIN+PAST: xál k̲áat'e.eel'ahlanggan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'e.eel'ahlanggiinii
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: xál k̲áat'e.eel'ahlans
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'e.eelaa'ahlang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: xál k̲áat'e.eelaa'ahlanggaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'e.eelaa'ahlanggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+REFLEXIVE: xál k̲áat'e.eel'ahl
